Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,113.01
Handicapped or disabled person;
parking permits; electronic system; department; duties.

The department
shall develop, implement, and maintain an electronic system for accepting
and processing applications for handicapped or disabled parking permits.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 23;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 5.